Utah statutes.
58-22-303.   Term of license -- Expiration -- Renewal.

(1)  The division shall issue each license under this chapter in accordance with a two-year renewal cycle established by rule.  The division may by rule extend or shorten a renewal period by as much as one year to stagger the renewal cycles it administers.

(2)  At the time of renewal the licensee shall show satisfactory evidence of completion of continuing education as may be required by rules enacted pursuant to Section 58-22-304.

(3)  Each license automatically expires on the expiration date shown on the license unless renewed by the licensee in accordance with Section 58-1-308.

